Washington statutes.
RCW 36.16.140

Public auction sales, where held.

Public auction sales of property conducted by or for the county must be held at such places as the county legislative authority may direct. A county may conduct a public auction sale by electronic media pursuant to RCW 36.16.145.

[ 2015 c 95 s 2. Prior: 1991 c 363 s 50; 1991 c 245 s 3; 1965 ex.s. c 23 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—2015 c 95: See note following RCW 36.16.145.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Building permit—County must require payroll estimate under industrial insurance act: RCW 51.12.070.

Public lands—Advertisement—Hours: RCW 79.11.165.

Sales of county property, where held: RCW 36.34.080.

Tax sales, where held: RCW 84.64.080, 36.35.120.